Idaho, session 2025, S1124.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Title 61, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 18, Title 61, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 18
WILDFIRE STANDARD OF CARE ACT
61-1801. SHORT TITLE. This chapter shall be known and may be cited as
the "Wildfire Standard of Care Act."
61-1802. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. In enacting this chapter, it is the in-
tent of the legislature to provide for the safe, efficient, and reliable
generation, transmission, and distribution of electric power at affordable
rates and in such ways that protect the public interest, health, safety, and
welfare. Preparation for and response to wildfire risk is an increasingly
important element of planning conducted by electric utilities. Proper
preparation is crucial to position electric utilities to avoid and respond
to wildfire risk. Knowing what measures should be taken to minimize wildfire
risk before it occurs and to respond to it when it does occur is central to the
affordable, safe, and reliable transmission and distribution of electric-
ity. It is essential to ensure these risks are addressed as needed and within
appropriate cost parameters so that electric power is kept affordable to the
public. This chapter is designed to direct the prudent use of resources by
electric utilities to mitigate and respond to wildfire risk within the costs
that can be justified as just and reasonable in order to keep rates afford-
able to utility customers.
61-1803. WILDFIRE MITIGATION PLANS. (1) For the purposes of this chap-
ter, "commission" means the Idaho public utilities commission.
(a) Each electric corporation that is a public utility as defined in
sections 61-119 and 61-129, Idaho Code, shall adopt and file a wildfire
mitigation plan with the commission for its review and approval pur-
suant to section 61-1804, Idaho Code. The commission shall order the
plans be filed at a date determined by it and may stagger filing dates.
(b) An electric corporation that is not a public utility, including but
not limited to a cooperative association distributing electric power to
its members or a municipal electric distribution system under section


50-342, Idaho Code, may file a wildfire mitigation plan with the commis-
sion for its review at any time permitted by the commission. If such a
plan is filed, the commission may assess reasonable fees to the electri-
cal corporation that is not a public utility for its review. The fee may
not exceed the actual reasonable cost incurred by the commission for the
review and consideration of a plan submitted to it.
(2) Each wildfire mitigation plan shall be developed using approaches
and methods that are reflective of and commensurate with the size and com-
plexity of the electric corporation's operations and of the nature of the
fire risk. At a minimum, each wildfire mitigation plan shall:
(a) Describe a means for mitigating wildfire risk that reflects a rea-
sonable balancing of mitigation costs with the resulting reduction of
wildfire risk;
(b) Describe the areas where an electric corporation has infrastruc-
ture or equipment that the electric corporation considers may be sub-
ject to a heightened risk of wildfire at the time the wildfire mitiga-
tion plan is finalized by the electric corporation;
(c) Describe preventative actions and programs that the electric cor-
poration will carry out to reduce the risk of wildfire;
(d) Describe community outreach and public awareness efforts that the
electric corporation will use before, during, and after wildfire sea-
son;
(e) Describe the outreach efforts to coordinate with federal, state,
tribal, and local officials and agencies on wildfire preparedness and
emergency response plans;
(f) Consider financially prudent and reasonably practicable methods of
line design for new and existing planned lines;
(g) Describe a means for monitoring forecasted and current weather data
for the purpose of assessing current and anticipated fire risk; and
(h) Describe and develop standards, procedures, and schedules, sub-
ject to timely approval of access to rights-of-way, if necessary, for
the following actions:
(i) Inspection of the electric corporation's assets, infra-
structure, and facilities within the areas that are identified as
heightened fire risk areas in the wildfire mitigation plan, where
financially prudent and reasonably practicable;
(ii) De-energization of the electric corporation's power lines,
if considered appropriate by the electric corporation; and
(iii) Vegetation management within the areas that are identified
as heightened fire risk areas in the wildfire mitigation plan and
are within the electric corporation's rights-of-way or are adja-
cent thereto and threaten the power lines or other electric corpo-
ration infrastructure.
(3) Wildfire mitigation plans approved by the commission shall be re-
viewed and updated no less frequently than every three (3) years. The plans
shall be updated, filed, and approved in accordance with this section and
section 61-1804, Idaho Code.
(4) An electric corporation with a commission-approved wildfire miti-
gation plan shall submit a report to the commission updating the commission
on the electric corporation's compliance with its wildfire mitigation plan


on an annual basis or on such other basis as the commission may prescribe by
rule or order, but no more frequently than annually.
61-1804. COMMISSION REVIEW OF WILDFIRE MITIGATION PLANS. (1) The com-
mission shall review a wildfire mitigation plan or an update thereto and, af-
ter notice and comment, and a public hearing if requested by an interested
person, within six (6) months of receiving such filing, shall approve or re-
ject the plan. In reviewing the plan, the commission shall ensure that it
meets the minimum requirements stated in section 61-1803, Idaho Code, and
shall consider the following factors:
(a) The consistency of the plan with the public health, safety, and wel-
fare;
(b) The feasibility of the plan and the cost of its implementation; and
(c) The degree to which the plan adequately minimizes wildfire risk and
proposes to respond to wildfires that do occur.
(2) In reviewing a plan, the commission shall consult with the Idaho
state forester for technical assistance.
61-1805. EFFECT OF WILDFIRE MITIGATION PLANS. In any civil action, a
commission-approved plan shall be deemed to be a reasonable and prudent plan
to establish adequate measures for the electric corporation to prepare for
and address wildfire risk and shall establish the electric corporation's
duty to its members and the public.
61-1806. LIABILITY. (1) For the purposes of this section, "substan-
tial compliance" or "substantially comply" means a reasonable good faith
effort by an electric corporation to adhere to the elements or metrics of
its wildfire mitigation plan and allows for minor deviations and minor omis-
sions.
(2) An electric corporation that substantially complies with a com-
mission-approved wildfire mitigation plan and whose acts or omissions are
not an intentional tort or willful or reckless misconduct, as that term is
defined in section 6-1601, Idaho Code, may not be found liable in any civil
action brought to recover damages or impose liability, including for death
of or injury to persons or property, resulting from any unplanned or uncon-
trolled fire, or for any action or omission taken in substantial compliance
with the wildfire mitigation plan, including omissions where an electric
corporation ceases to take action that was originally included in a wildfire
mitigation plan but removed from the plan in a later plan approved by the
commission.
(3) If an electric corporation fails to substantially comply with an
essential element of a commission-approved wildfire mitigation plan and
that failure is the actual and proximate cause of harm to the plaintiff, then
a plaintiff seeking damages in any civil action may only recover:
(a) Such actual economic damages for property loss as expressly pro-
vided in section 38-107(2), Idaho Code; and
(b) Damages for personal injury subject to the limitations expressly
provided in section 6-1603, Idaho Code.
(4) If an electric corporation fails to substantially comply with an
essential element of a commission-approved wildfire mitigation plan and


that failure is the actual and proximate cause of harm to the plaintiff, and
its act or omission constitutes an intentional tort or willful or reckless
misconduct, as that term is defined in section 6-1601, Idaho Code, then a
plaintiff in any civil action may only recover:
(a) Such actual economic damages for property loss as expressly pro-
vided for in section 38-107(2), Idaho Code;
(b) Economic and noneconomic damages for personal injury subject to
section 6-1603, Idaho Code; and
(c) Punitive damages, if otherwise allowable pursuant to section
6-1604, Idaho Code, subject to the limitations expressly provided
therein.
61-1807. DENIAL OF ACCESS TO RIGHTS-OF-WAY. If an electric corpora-
tion is denied or delayed access to privately-owned land or an easement or
right-of-way on land owned by the state, a federal agency, or a tribal gov-
ernment after the electric corporation requests access to the easement or
right-of-way to perform vegetation management or fire mitigation work in
accordance with a wildfire mitigation plan or to upgrade or repair the elec-
tric corporation's assets, infrastructure, or facilities and such denial
or delay prevents the electric corporation from doing timely or sufficient
vegetation management and fuel clearance within the electric corporation's
rights-of-way or from performing any upgrade to or inspection or repair of
the electric corporation's assets, infrastructure, and facilities, the
electric corporation shall not be held liable in any civil action for damages
that are directly or indirectly caused by failing to act.
61-1808. EXCLUSIVE REMEDY. Except to the extent title 72, Idaho Code,
is applicable, the civil actions identified in section 61-1806, Idaho Code,
shall be the exclusive civil remedies available against an electric corpora-
tion for injury resulting from any unplanned or uncontrolled fire or for any
act or omission related to a wildfire mitigation plan. This section does not
limit an insurer's ability to exercise valid subrogation rights subject to
the liability framework established in section 61-1806, Idaho Code.
61-1809. IMMUNITY. The commission and its employees, when acting
within the course and scope of their employment and without malice or crim-
inal intent, shall not be liable for any claim arising out of approval of a
wildfire mitigation plan as provided pursuant to chapter 9, title 6, Idaho
Code.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.